New York, session 2025-2026, A1854.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3301.9.2.1 of section 3301 of the New York city 2 building code, as amended by section 32 of part C of local law number 3 126 of the city of New York for the year 2021, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 3301.9.2.1 Sidewalk shed parapet information panel content. Sidewalk 6 shed parapet information panels shall contain the following information 7 and be arranged in accordance with Figure 3301.9.2.1: 8 1. The street address of the site; 9 2. Name (which may incorporate a logo) of the contractor responsible 10 for the site or where there is no contractor, the name (which may incor- 11 porate a logo) of the owner of the site; [and] 12 3. The issuance date of the sidewalk shed permit; 13 4. The expiration date of the sidewalk shed permit and the expiration 14 date of any permit renewals; and 15 5. The statement "For more information, visit www.nyc.gov/buildings." 16 § 2. Section 3314 of the New York city building code, as amended by 17 section 44 of part C of local law number 126 for the city of New York 18 for the year 2021, is amended by adding three new sections 3314.2.1, 19 3314.2.1.1 and 3314.2.1.2 to read as follows: 20 3314.2.1 Scaffold sign content. Where scaffolding is installed, a sign 21 readily visible from the street shall be posted that runs along the long 22 axis of the scaffolding. Such scaffolding sign shall be in place 23 throughout the duration that the scaffold remains at the site. Such 24 scaffold sign shall include: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04870-01-5 A. 1854 2 1 1. The street address of the scaffold site; 2 2. Name (which may incorporate a logo) of the contractor responsible 3 for the scaffolding or where there is no contractor, the name (which may 4 incorporate a logo) of the owner of the site; 5 3. The issuance date of the scaffold permit; 6 4. The expiration date of the scaffold permit and the expiration date 7 of any permit renewals; and 8 5. The statement "For more information, visit www.nyc.gov/buildings." 9 3314.2.1.1 Scaffold sign material. Scaffold signs shall be constructed 10 out of a durable and weatherproof material such as vinyl, plastic, or 11 aluminum, and such material shall be flame retardant in accordance with 12 NFPA 701 or listed under UL 214. 13 3314.2.1.2 Updating content. When content required by section 3314.2.1 14 changes, the scaffold sign shall be updated. 15 § 3. The New York city department of buildings shall update figure 16 3301.9.2.1 of section 3301 of the New York city building code to reflect 17 the changes made by section one of this act. 18 § 4. The New York city department of buildings shall establish the 19 layout and content of the signage required pursuant to section 3314.2.1 20 of section 3314 of the New York city building code, as added by section 21 two of this act. 22 § 5. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026. Effective immediate- 23 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 24 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 25 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.